Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.110

Coordination of transportation improvement board and county road administration board.

The county road administration board and the transportation improvement board shall jointly adopt rules to assure coordination of their respective programs especially with respect to projects proposed by the group of incorporated cities outside the boundaries of federally approved urban areas, and to encourage the system development of county-city arterials in rural areas.

[ 1988 c 167 s 7; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 11.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1988 c 167: See notes following RCW 47.26.121.